Connecticut, session 2026, HB05388.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 20-7c of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
3 1, 2026):
4 (d) Upon a written request of a patient, a patient's attorney or
5 authorized representative, or pursuant to a written authorization, a
6 provider, except as provided in section 4-194, shall furnish to the person
7 making such request a copy of the patient's health record, including but
8 not limited to, bills, x-rays and copies of laboratory reports, contact lens
9 specifications based on examinations and final contact lens fittings
10 given within the preceding three months or such longer period of time
11 as determined by the provider but no longer than six months, records of
12 prescriptions and other technical information used in assessing the
13 patient's health condition. No provider shall refuse to return to a patient
HB5388 / File No. 102 1

HB5388 File No. 102
14 original records or copies of records that the patient has brought to the
15 provider from another provider. When returning records to a patient, a
16 provider may retain copies of such records for the provider's file,
17 provided such provider does not charge the patient for the costs
18 incurred in copying such records. No provider shall charge more than
19 sixty-five cents per page, including any research fees, handling fees or
20 related costs, and the cost of first class postage, if applicable, for
21 furnishing a health record pursuant to this subsection, except such
22 provider may charge a patient the amount necessary to cover the cost of
23 materials for furnishing a copy of an x-ray, provided no such charge
24 shall be made for furnishing a health record or part thereof to a patient,
25 a patient's attorney or authorized representative if the record or part
26 thereof is necessary for the purpose of supporting a claim or appeal
27 under any provision of the Social Security Act or a claim or appeal for
28 veterans' benefits under any provision of Title 38 of the United States
29 Code or chapter 506 or application for disability retirement benefits
30 under the state employees retirement system and the request is
31 accompanied by documentation of the claim or appeal or application. A
32 provider shall furnish a health record requested pursuant to this section
33 within thirty days of the request. No health care provider, who has
34 purchased or assumed the practice of a provider who is retiring or
35 deceased, may refuse to return original records or copied records to a
36 patient who decides not to seek care from the successor provider. When
37 returning records to a patient who has decided not to seek care from a
38 successor provider, such provider may not charge a patient for costs
39 incurred in copying the records of the retired or deceased provider.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 20-7c(d)
LAB Joint Favorable
HB5388 / File No. 102 2

HB5388 File No. 102
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
UConn Health Ctr. OF - Revenue Less than Less than
Loss 750 1,000
Note: OF=UConn Health Operating Funds
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a revenue loss of less than $750 in FY 27 and less
than $1,000 in FY 28 and annually thereafter to the UConn Health
Center. It does so by preventing health care providers from charging a
fee for copies of medical records requested in relation to an application
for state employee disability retirement benefits. The lower revenue loss
indicated in FY 27 is due to the bill's 10/1/26 effective date.
UConn Health charges one cent per page for such records and
receives about 12 requests per year.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to the number of copies of such medical
records requested, and the fees UConn Health charges for those copies.
HB5388 / File No. 102 3

HB5388 File No. 102
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5388
AN ACT CONCERNING PROCESSING FEES FOR MEDICAL
RECORDS FOR APPLICATIONS FOR DISABILITY RETIREMENT.